Idaho, session 2025, H0008.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 61-106, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 2. That Section 61-107, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 3. That Section 61-108, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 4. That Section 61-109, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 5. That Section 61-112, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 6. That Section 61-201, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
61-201. CREATION -- APPOINTMENT AND TERM OF OFFICE OF MEMBERS OF THE
IDAHO PUBLIC UTILITIES COMMISSION -- FILLING OF VACANCIES. There is hereby
created a state commission to be known and designated as the Idaho public
utilities commission. The commission shall be comprised of three (3) mem-
bers appointed by the governor, with the approval of the senate. Not more
than two (2) members of said commission shall belong to the same political
party. The members of the first commission after taking effect of this act
shall be appointed for terms beginning with the effective date of this act
and expiring as follows: Two (2) commissioners for a term expiring the sec-
ond Monday in January, 1953, and one (1) commissioner for a term expiring the
second Monday in January, 1955. Each of the commissioners shall hold office
until his successor is appointed and qualified. On the second Monday in Jan-
uary, 1961, the governor shall appoint one (1) commissioner for a four (4)
year term and one (1) commissioner for a six (6) year term, and on the second
Monday in January, 1963, the governor shall appoint one (1) commissioner for
a six (6) year term. On the second Monday in January of each second year after
the year of 1963, the governor shall appoint one (1) commissioner for a six
(6) year term. Whenever a vacancy in the office of commissioner shall occur,
the governor shall forthwith appoint a qualified person to fill the same for
the unexpired term. If any appointment is made during the recess of the leg-
islature, it shall be subject to confirmation by the senate during its next
ensuing session.
SECTION 7. That Section 61-208, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:


61-208. OFFICE AND MEETINGS. The office of the commission shall be in
Ada county. The office shall always be open Monday through Friday, 8:00 a.m.
to 5:00 p.m., legal holidays and nonjudicial days excepted. The commission
shall hold its session at least once in each calendar month, and may also meet
at such other times and in such other places as may be expedient and necessary
for the proper performance of its duties. For the purpose of holding ses-
sions in places other than the office of the commission, the commission shall
have the power to rent quarters or offices, and the expense thereof and in
connection therewith, shall be paid in the same manner as the other expenses
authorized by this act. The sessions of the commission shall be public.
SECTION 8. That Section 61-304, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 9. That Section 61-305, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
61-305. SCHEDULES OF OTHERS THAN COMMON CARRIERS PUBLIC UTILI-
TIES. Under such rules and regulations as the commission may prescribe,
every public utility other than a common carrier shall file with the commis-
sion within such time and in such form as the commission may designate, and
shall print and keep open to public inspection schedules showing all rates,
tolls, rentals, charges and classifications collected or enforced, or to
be collected or enforced, together with all rules, regulations, contracts,
privileges and facilities which that in any manner affect or relate to rates,
tolls, rentals, classifications or service. The rates, tolls, rentals and
charges shown on such schedules when filed by a public utility as to which the
commission by this act acquires the power to fix any rates, tolls, rentals
or charges, shall not, within any portion of the territory as to which the
commission acquires as to such public utility such power, exceed the rates,
tolls, rentals or charges in effect on the second day of January, 1913, the.
The rates, tolls, rentals and charges shown on such schedules when filed by
any public utility as to any territory as to which the commission does not
by this act acquire as to such public utility such power, shall not exceed
the rates, tolls, rentals and charges in effect at the time the commission
acquires as to such territory and as to such public utility, the power to fix
rates, tolls, rentals or charges. Nothing in this section contained shall
prevent the commission from approving or fixing the rates, tolls, rentals
or charges, from time to time, in excess or less than those shown by said
schedules.
SECTION 10. That Section 61-307, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
61-307. SCHEDULES -- CHANGE IN RATE AND SERVICE. Unless the commis-
sion otherwise orders, no change shall be made by any public utility in any
rate, fare, toll, rental, charge or classification, or in any rule, regu-
lation or contract relating to or affecting any rate, fare, toll, rental,
charge, classification or service, or in any privilege or facility, except
after thirty (30) days' notice to the commission and to the public as herein
provided. Such notice shall be given by filing with the commission and keep-


ing open for public inspection new schedules stating plainly the change or
changes to be made in the schedule or schedules then in force, and the time
when the change or changes will go into effect. The commission, for good
cause shown, may allow changes without requiring the thirty (30) days' no-
tice herein provided for, by an order specifying the changes so to be made
and the time when they shall take effect, and the manner in which they shall
be filed and published. When any change is proposed in any rate, fare, toll,
rental, charge or classification, or in any form of contract or agreement, or
in any rule, regulation or contract relating to or affecting any rate, fare,
toll, rental, charge, classification or service, or in any privilege or fa-
cility, attention shall be directed to such change on the schedule filed with
the commission by some character to be designated by the commission, immedi-
ately preceding or following the item.
SECTION 11. That Section 61-308, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
61-308. SCHEDULES -- JOINT RATES. The names of the several public
utilities which that are parties to any joint tariff, rate, fare, toll con-
tract, classification or charge shall be specified in the schedule or sched-
ules showing the same. Unless otherwise ordered by the commission, a sched-
ule showing such joint tariff, rate, fare, toll, contract, classification or
charge need be filed with the commission by only one (1) of the parties to it:
provided, that there is also filed with the commission in such form as the
commission may require a concurrence in such joint tariff rate, fare, toll,
contract, classification or charge by each of the other parties thereto.
SECTION 12. That Section 61-309, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 13. That Section 61-310, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 14. That Section 61-311, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 15. That Section 61-312, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 16. That Section 61-313, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
61-313. SCHEDULE CHARGES ONLY PERMITTED. Except as in this act other-
wise provided, no public utility shall charge, demand, collect or receive
a greater or lesser or different compensation from any product or commod-
ity furnished or to be furnished or for any service rendered or to be ren-
dered than the rates, tolls, rentals and charges applicable to such product
or commodity or service as specified in its schedules on file and in effect
at the time, nor shall any such public utility refund or remit, directly or
indirectly, in any manner or by any device, any portion of the rates, tolls,
rentals and charges so specified nor extend to any corporation or person any


form of contract or agreement or any rule or regulation of any facility or
privilege except such as are specified in such schedules and as are regularly
and uniformly extended to all corporations and persons: provided, that mes-
sages by telephone or cable, subject to the provisions of this act, may be
classified by the utility into day, night, repeated, unrepeated, letter,
commercial, press, government and such other classes of messages: provided
further, that nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prevent tele-
phone and cable companies from entering into contract with common carriers
for the exchange of service at rates common to all common carriers of like
class.
SECTION 17. That Section 61-314, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
61-314. SCHEDULE OF RATES WITHIN AND WITHOUT STATE. Every common
carrier and every telephone corporation shall print and file or cause to
be filed with the commission, schedules showing all rates, fares, tolls,
rentals, charges and classifications for the transportation of persons or
property or the transmission of messages or conversations between all points
within this state and all points without the this state upon on its route, and
between all points within this state and all points without the this state
upon on every route leased, operated or controlled by it, and between all
points on its route or upon on any route, leased, operated or controlled by it
within this state and all points without the this state upon on the route of
any other common carrier or telephone corporation whenever a through route
and joint rate shall have been established between any two (2) such points.
SECTION 18. That Section 61-315A, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 19. That Section 61-322, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 20. That Section 61-326, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 21. That Section 61-402, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
61-402. INVENTORY OF PHYSICAL PROPERTIES. (1) Every public utility,
except railroad corporations, shall file with the commission an inventory
of all its physical properties within the state, designating the exact lo-
cation of its property within the several counties of the state; such inven-
tory shall show in detail the cost of construction together with the depre-
ciation charges incident thereto since construction, or may show the cost of
replacement of such properties, if in the opinion of the commission the orig-
inal cost and depreciation charges cannot be obtained:; provided, that in
the event any public utility refuses or neglects to file such inventory, or
the inventory so filed is inaccurate, the commission may send its agents upon
the ground and make an inventory as desired by the commission. The entire
cost of making such inventory by the agents of the commission shall be paid by


the public utility from its profit and loss account and shall not be charged
to operating expenses, and such payment shall be made to the treasurer of the
state, who shall deposit the same to the credit of the fund provided for the
engineering department of said commission.
(2) Every public utility shall file the inventory herein required
within six (6) months after the approval of this section by the governor un-
less for just cause shown the commission may extend such time and shall file
new, amended, or supplemental inventories at such times thereafter as the
commission may require.
SECTION 22. That Section 61-502, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
61-502. DETERMINATION OF RATES. Whenever the commission, after a
hearing had upon its own motion or upon complaint, shall find that the rates,
fares, tolls, rentals, charges or classifications, or any of them, demanded,
observed, charged or collected by any public utility for any service or
product or commodity, or in connection therewith, including the rates or
fares for excursions or commutation tickets, or that the rules, regulations,
practices, or contracts, or any of them, affecting such rates, fares, tolls,
rentals, charges or classifications, or any of them, are unjust, unreason-
able, discriminatory or preferential, or in any wise way in violation of
any provision of law, or that such rates, fares, tolls, rentals, charges or
classifications are insufficient, the commission shall determine the just,
reasonable or sufficient rates, fares, tolls, rentals, charges, classifica-
tions, rules, regulations, practices or contracts to be thereafter observed
and in force and shall fix the same by order as hereinafter provided, and
shall, under such rules and regulations as the commission may prescribe, fix
the reasonable maximum rates to be charged for water by any public utility
coming within the provisions of this act relating to the sale of water.
SECTION 23. That Section 61-503, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
61-503. POWER TO INVESTIGATE AND FIX RATES AND REGULATIONS. The com-
mission shall have power, upon a hearing, had upon its own motion or upon
complaint, to investigate a single rate, fare, toll, rental, charge, clas-
sification, rule, regulation, contract or practice, or any number thereof,
or the entire schedule or schedules of rates, fares, tolls, rentals,
charges, classifications, rules, regulations, contracts or practices, or
any thereof, of any public utility, and to establish new rates, fares, tolls,
rentals, charges, classifications, rules, regulations, contracts or prac-
tices or schedule or schedules in lieu thereof.
SECTION 24. That Section 61-504, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 25. That Section 61-506, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:


61-506. INTERSTATE RATES. The commission shall have the power to in-
vestigate all existing or proposed interstate rates, fares, tolls, rentals,
charges and classifications, and all rules and regulations and practices
in relation thereto, for or in relation to the transportation of persons or
property or the transmission of messages or conversations, where any act in
relation thereto shall take place within this state; and when the same are,
in the opinion of the commission, excessive or discriminatory or in viola-
tion of the act of congress entitled "An act to regulate commerce," approved
February 4, 1887, and the acts amendatory thereof and supplementary thereto,
or of any other act of congress, or in conflict with the rulings, orders or
regulations of the interstate commerce commission, the commission may apply
by petition or otherwise to the interstate commerce commission or to any
court of competent jurisdiction for relief.
SECTION 26. That Section 61-530, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 27. That Section 61-622, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
61-622. FINDING OF COMMISSION NECESSARY FOR INCREASE IN RATE AND AP-
PROVAL OF A NEW TARIFF OR SCHEDULE -- SUSPENSION. (1) No public utility shall
raise any existing rate, fare, toll, rental, or charge or so alter any exist-
ing classification, contract, practice, rule, service, or regulation as to
result in an increase in any rate, fare, toll, rental, or charge, under any
circumstances whatsoever, except upon a showing before the commission and a
finding by the commission that such increase is justified.
(2) Whenever there shall be filed with the commission any tariff or
schedule stating a new individual or joint rate, fare, toll, rental, charge,
classification, contract, practice, rule, service or regulation that does
not increase or result in the increase of any existing rate, fare, toll,
rental, or charge, such tariff or schedule shall not become effective except
upon a showing to and a finding by the commission that such tariff or schedule
is justified.
(3) The commission shall have power and is hereby given authority to
suspend the proposed effective date of any new tariff, schedule, rate, fare,
toll, rental, charge, classification, contract, practice, rule, service
or regulation, either upon complaint or upon its own initiative without
complaint, at once, and if it so orders, without answer or other formal
pleadings by the interested public utility or utilities. The commission
shall provide reasonable notice that it intends to conduct a hearing or
other proceeding concerning the propriety of such new tariff, schedule,
rate, fare, toll, rental, charge, classification, contract, practice, rule,
service or regulation. Pending the subsequent hearing or proceeding and de-
cision thereon, such new tariff, schedule, rate, fare, toll, rental, charge,
classification, contract, practice, rule, service or regulation shall not
go into effect.
(4) The period of suspension of such new tariff, schedule, rate, fare,
toll, rental, charge, classification, contract, practice, rule, service or
regulation shall not extend beyond thirty (30) days when such new tariff,
schedule, rate, fare, toll, rental, charge, classification, contract, prac-


tice, rule, service or regulation would otherwise go into effect, pursuant
to section 61-307, Idaho Code, unless the commission in its discretion ex-
tends the period of suspension for an initial period not exceeding five (5)
months, nor unless the commission after a showing of good cause on the record
grants an additional sixty (60) days. Prior to the expiration of said peri-
ods of suspension, the commission may, with the consent in writing signed by
the party filing such new tariff or schedule, permanently or further suspend
the same.
(5) After such hearing or other proceeding during the suspension pe-
riod, the commission shall issue its order approving, denying or amending
the proposed tariffs, schedules, rates, fares, tolls, rentals, charges,
classifications, contracts, practices, rules, services or regulations in
whole or in part, or others in lieu thereof, which it shall find it finds to be
just and reasonable.
SECTION 28. That Section 61-637, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
61-637. STAY OF ORDER ON APPEAL -- BOND. In case the order or decision
of the commission is stayed or suspended, the order of the court shall not
become effective until a suspending bond shall first have been executed and
filed with, and approved by the commission (or approved on review by the
court), payable to the people of the state of Idaho, and sufficient in amount
and security to insure ensure the prompt payment, by the party petitioning
for the review, of all damages caused by the delay in the enforcement of the
order or decision of the commission, and of all moneys which that any person
or corporation may be compelled to pay, pending the review proceedings, for
transportation, transmission, product, commodity, or service in excess of
the charges fixed by the order or decision of the commission, in case said
order or decision is sustained. The court, in case it stays or suspends the
order or decision of the commission in any matter affecting rates, fares,
tolls, rentals, charges or classifications, shall also by order direct the
public utility affected to pay into court, from time to time, there to be
impounded until the final decision of the case or into some bank or trust
company paying interest on deposits, under such conditions as the court may
prescribe, all sums of money which that it may collect from any corporation
or person in excess of the sum such corporation or person would have been com-
pelled to pay if the order or decision of the commission had not been stayed
or suspended.
SECTION 29. That Section 61-638, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
61-638. STAY OF ORDER ON APPEAL -- ACCOUNTS PENDING FINAL DECISION. In
case the court stays or suspends any order or decision lowering any rate,
fare, toll, rental, charge, or classification, the commission, upon the
execution and approval of said suspending bond, shall forthwith require the
public utility affected under the penalty of the immediate enforcement of
the order or decision of the commission (pending the review and notwith-
standing the suspending order) to keep such accounts verified by oath, as may
in the judgment of the commission suffice to show the amounts being charged


or received by such public utility, pending the review, in excess of the
charges allowed by the order or decision of the commission, together with
the names and addresses of the corporations or persons to whom overcharges
will be refundable in case the charges made by the public utility, pending
the review, be not sustained by the court. The court may, from time to time,
require said party petitioning for a review to give additional security on
or to increase the said suspending bond whenever in the opinion of the court
the same may be necessary to insure ensure the prompt payment of said damages
and said overcharges. Upon the final decision by the court, all moneys which
that the public utility may have collected, pending the appeal in excess of
those authorized by such final decision, together with interest in case the
court ordered the deposit of such moneys in a bank or trust company, shall
be promptly paid to the corporations or persons entitled thereto, in such
manner and through such methods of distribution as may be prescribed by the
commission. If any such moneys shall not have been claimed by the corpora-
tions or persons entitled thereto within one (1) year from the final decision
of the court, the commission shall cause notice to such corporation or per-
son to be given by publication, once a week for two (2) successive weeks,
in a newspaper of general circulation, printed and published in the city of
Boise, and such other newspaper or newspapers as may be designated by the
commission, said notice to state the names of the corporations or persons
entitled to such moneys and the amount due each corporation or person. All
moneys not claimed within three (3) months after the publication of said
notice shall be paid by the public utility under the direction of the commis-
sion, into the state treasury for the benefit of the general fund.
SECTION 30. That Section 61-1003, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
61-1003. RETURNS -- FORMS AND PREPARATION -- TIME OF FILING AND FIRST
FEE PAYMENT. On or before April 1st of each year, each public utility and
railroad corporation subject to the jurisdiction of the commission, shall
file with the commission a return verified by an officer or agent of the pub-
lic utility or railroad corporation involved, showing its gross operating
revenues from its intrastate utility or railroad business in Idaho for the
preceding calendar year during which it carried on such intrastate utility
or railroad business. Such return shall be in such form and detail as the
commission may prescribe and shall be subject to audit by the commission.
Payments shall be made as provided in section 61-1005, Idaho Code.
The first return hereunder shall set forth the gross operating revenues
derived from intrastate utility or railroad business during the calen-
dar year 1954. The first quarter biennium installment of fees due on the
1955-1956 fiscal appropriation shall be made on or before May 15, 1955, and
semiannually thereafter as provided in section 61-1005 of this act.
SECTION 31. That Section 61-1005, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
61-1005. PAYMENT OF FEES -- TIME AND MANNER -- PROCEDURE ON NONPAY-
MENT. On or before May 1st of each year, the commission shall notify each
public utility and railroad corporation subject to the provisions of this


act, by mail, of the amount of its fee for the ensuing fiscal year beginning
July 1st, computed as in this act provided. Such fee shall be paid to the
commission in equal semiannual installments on or before the 15th days of
November and May 15 and November 15 in each fiscal calendar year. If payment
shall not be made on or before said respective dates, the installments so due
shall bear interest at the rate of six per cent percent (6%) per annum until
such time as the full amount of the installment shall have been paid. Upon
failure, refusal or neglect of any public utility or railroad corporation to
pay such fee, the attorney general shall commence an action in the name of the
state to collect the same.
SECTION 32. That Chapter 11, Title 61, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby repealed.
SECTION 33. That Section 62-610F, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
62-610F. HIGH-COST SUPPORT -- ADMINISTRATION -- TRANSITION. (1) The
commission shall establish a universal service fund to enable eligible
telecommunications carriers to make universal service widely available to
all persons within the state of Idaho at reasonable rates. Eligible telecom-
munications carriers receiving financial support shall use that support
only for the provision, maintenance and upgrading of services and facilities
for which the support is intended.
(2) The commission shall initiate a proceeding to determine and adopt
the appropriate methodology and mechanisms to collect and distribute fi-
nancial assistance which that are specific, predictable and sufficient in
conjunction with federal universal service support mechanisms to preserve
and advance universal service within the state of Idaho. Revenue for the
fund shall be collected through a uniform universal service fund surcharge
as calculated by the commission. The surcharge shall be imposed on end
users of all retail telecommunications services originating and terminating
within the state of Idaho and collected by the telecommunications carrier
providing telecommunications services to such end user. Disbursements from
the fund shall be used to defray the costs, as determined by the commission,
of providing universal service to customers within a geographic support
area. Those costs shall be calculated using a forward-looking cost method-
ology. When providing disbursements from the fund, the commission shall
take such actions as may be necessary to prevent redundant cost recovery by
recipients of such funds, including the reduction of access charges subject
to title 61 or 62, Idaho Code.
(3) The commission shall establish procedures to administer the uni-
versal service fund and shall contract with a neutral third party for ad-
ministration of the fund. The administrator shall perform the duties re-
quired by the commission including data gathering, collecting the surcharge
revenues, disbursing funds, and notifying the commission of any fund viola-
tions.
(4) The commission shall develop procedures and provide for a transi-
tion period to begin no earlier than January 1, 2001, for rural telephone
companies to replace funding available pursuant to section 62-610, Idaho


Code, with the funding mechanism established pursuant to this section for
the support of universal service.
SECTION 34. That Section 62-623, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 35. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.